Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Distress Warrants

6-55-301. Purpose.

If any person or corporation required by law to pay privilege taxes to any municipal corporation, or to obtain a license before engaging in same, presumes to sell goods or exercise a privilege without first obtaining a license as required by law, such clerk, recorder, or collecting officer shall issue to the sheriff, city marshal, or any constable a distress warrant, commanding such sheriff, city marshal or constable to levy, in case of a privilege tax, double the highest tax imposed upon any such privilege, and in other cases double the highest tax imposed on any similar business, together with costs and charges, by distraining and selling so much of the delinquent's goods and chattels as shall be sufficient for the purpose.

Acts 1891, ch. 57, § 1; Shan., § 1918; Code 1932, § 3330; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-710.

6-55-302. Execution.

The officer to whose hands such warrants shall come shall immediately execute the same, on pain of being held personally liable in the circuit court, on motion by the clerk, recorder, or collecting officer, for the double tax, cost, and charges lost by such officer's delay.

Acts 1891, ch. 57, § 2; Shan., § 1919; Code 1932, § 3331; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-711.

6-55-303. Sale.

The officer, having seized the goods and chattels of the delinquent, shall give ten (10) days' notice of the time and place of sale, which the officer shall make at the time specified, unless the owner, at or before the time of sale, produces the clerk's, recorder's, or collecting officer's receipt for the tax, cost, and charges, in which case the officer shall redeliver the goods to the owner.

Acts 1891, ch. 57, § 3; Shan., § 1920; Code 1932, § 3332; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-712.

6-55-304. Fees.

In all cases in which the penalty prescribed against breaches of the revenue laws in relation to license is recovered, double fees shall be allowed to the clerk, recorder, and collecting officer or attorney prosecuting the case.

Acts 1891, ch. 57, § 4; Shan., § 1921; Code 1932, § 3333; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-713.